tables/en-g3.ctb
### One-celled word signs (one- and two-celled) ###
# Only some of them may be used as partword
word a 9-1-19
after letter endword \sa 1-19
joinword am 39-2-139
word am 1-134
after letter endword \sam 39-2-59
after letter before letter midword \sam\s 39-2-139
# After a digit, keep both spaces around this Lower1 word; punctuation may still follow directly.
after digit endword \sam 0-39-2-59
after digit before letter midword \sam\s 0-39-2-59-0
joinword an 9-2-19
joinword and 29-12346-129
word and 29-12346-129
nocross always and 12346
nocross begmidword anda 12346
nocross begmidword andi 12346
joinword are 39-256-139
word are 39-256-59
after letter endword \sare 39-256-59
after letter before letter midword \sare\s 39-256-139
after digit endword \sare 0-39-256-59
after digit before letter midword \sare\s 0-39-256-59-0
joinword as 9-1356-19
word as 9-1356-19
before punctuation always at 1-2345
joinword at 9-3-19
noback pass2 @19[@9-3-19] @0-9-3-19
noback pass2 @129[@9-3-19] @0-9-3-19
noback pass2 @1239[@9-3-19] @0-9-3-19
noback pass2 @149[@9-3-19] @0-9-3-19
noback pass2 @1249[@9-3-19] @0-9-3-19
joinword be 39-23-139
word be 39-23-59
after letter endword \sbe 39-23-59
after letter before letter midword \sbe\s 39-23-139
after digit endword \sbe 0-39-23-59
after digit before letter midword \sbe\s 0-39-23-59-0
joinword been 39-235-139
word been 39-235-59
after letter endword \sbeen 39-235-59
after letter before letter midword \sbeen\s 39-235-139
after digit endword \sbeen 0-39-235-59
after digit before letter midword \sbeen\s 0-39-235-59-0
word but 9-12-19
joinword by 49-356-149
word can 9-14-19
word child 9-16-19
word come 239-36-1239
nocross always come 36
word do 9-145-19
word enough 239-26-1239
word every 9-15-19
joinword for 29-123456-129
word for 29-123456-129
nocross always for 123456
word from 9-124-19
word go 9-1245-19
word have 9-125-19
after letter endword \shave 125-19
always (his 2356-125-24-234
joinword his 39-236-139
word his 39-236-59
after letter endword \shis 39-236-59
after letter before letter midword \shis\s 39-236-139
after digit endword \shis 0-39-236-59
after digit before letter midword \shis\s 0-39-236-59-0
word i 9-24-19
word in 239-35-1239
nocross always in 35
nocross begmidword ina 35
nocross begmidword ine 35
nocross begmidword ini 35
nocross begmidword ino 35
nocross begmidword inu 35
joinword is 39-25-139
word is 39-25-59
joinword into 49-35-235-149
word into 35-235
after letter endword \sis 39-25-59
after letter before letter midword \sis\s 39-25-139
after digit endword \sis 0-39-25-59
after digit before letter midword \sis\s 0-39-25-59-0
joinword it 9-1346-19
word it 9-1346-19
word just 9-245-19
nocross always just 245
word knowledge 9-13-19
word like 9-123-19
nocross always like 123
word me 9-345-19
word more 9-134-19
word no 9-3456-19
word not 9-1345-19
word now 9-246-19
word o 12349-135-12349
joinword of 29-12356-129
word of 29-12356-129
nocross always of 12356
word on 9-135-19
word or 9-346-19
word out 9-1256-19
word people 9-1234-19
word quite 9-12345-19
word rather 9-1235-19
word shall 9-146-19
word so 9-234-19
word still 9-34-19
word that 9-2345-19
joinword the 29-2346-129
word the 29-2346-129
nocross always the 2346
word them 9-126-19
word this 9-1456-19
joinword to 49-235-149
word to 49-235-149
word us 9-136-19
word very 9-1236-19
joinword was 39-356-139
word was 39-356-59
after letter endword \swas 39-356-59
after letter before letter midword \swas\s 39-356-139
after digit endword \swas 0-39-356-59
after digit before letter midword \swas\s 0-39-356-59-0
word we 9-12456-19
joinword were 39-2356-139
word were 39-2356-59
after letter endword \swere 39-2356-59
after letter before letter midword \swere\s 39-2356-139
after digit endword \swere 0-39-2356-59
after digit before letter midword \swere\s 0-39-2356-59-0
always were? 2456-12456-15-236
word what 9-1246-19
word which 9-156-19
word will 9-2456-19
joinword with 29-23456-129
word with 29-23456-129
nocross always with 23456
word you 9-13456-19

# Two-celled word signs
# All may be used as partword, but subject to other rules and preferences.

# A
joinword act 249-4-1-1249
before punctuation word act 249-4-1
# noback pass2 !$s[@1-14-2345] @4-1
nocross always act 349-4-1
joinword all 249-456-1-1249
word all 249-456-1-1249
joinword allow 249-456-246-1249
word allow 249-456-246-1249
nocross always allow 349-456-246
joinword alone 249-5-2-1249
word alone 249-5-2-1249
nocross always alone 1-123-5-135
joinword along 249-456-2-1249
word along 249-456-2-1249
nocross begword along 349-456-2
joinword among 249-5-1-1249
word among 249-5-1-1249
always among 1-134-56-1245
joinword another 249-45-2-1249
word another 249-45-2-1249
nocross always another 1-1345-2346-1235
joinword any 249-4-12346-1249
word any 249-4-12346-1249
nocross always any 349-4-12346
joinword anybody 249-45-12346-1249
word anybody 249-45-12346-1249
joinword anyone 249-5-12346-1249
word anyone 249-5-12346-1249
joinword anything 249-456-12346-1249
word anything 249-456-12346-1249
joinword appear 249-45-1-1249
word appear 249-45-1-1249
nocross always appear 349-45-1
joinword ask 249-5-1356-1249
word ask 249-5-1356-1249
nocross always ask 349-5-1356

# B
joinword bear 249-45-12-1249
word bear 249-45-12-1249
nocross always bear 349-45-12
joinword become 249-5-23-1249
word become 249-5-23-1249
begword become 349-5-23
midendword become 23-36
joinword beginning 249-4-23-1249
word beginning 249-4-23-1249
joinword believe 249-45-23-1249
word believe 249-45-23-1249
begword believe 349-45-23
midendword believe 23-123-6-1236
joinword belong 249-456-23-1249
word belong 249-456-23-1249
begword belong 349-456-23
midendword belong 23-123-56-1245
joinword better 249-4-12-1249
word better 249-4-12-1249
nocross begword better 349-4-12
midendword better 12-15-356-12456
joinword bring 249-5-12-1249
word bring 249-5-12-1249
nocross begword bring 349-5-12
midendword bring 12-1235-346
joinword brought 249-456-12-1249
word brought 249-456-12-1249
always brought 12-1235-5-1256

# C
joinword came 249-456-36-1249
word came 249-456-36-1249
nocross endword came 349-456-36
joinword cannot 249-456-14-1249
word cannot 249-456-14-1249
joinword change 249-4-16-1249
word change 249-4-16-1249
nocross always change 349-4-16
joinword character 249-5-16-1249
word character 249-5-16-1249
nocross always character 349-5-16
joinword charge 249-456-16-1249
word charge 249-456-16-1249
nocross always charge 349-456-16
joinword chief 249-45-16-1249
word chief 249-45-16-1249
nocross begword chief 349-45-16
joinword christ 249-5-14-1249
word christ 249-5-14-1249
nocross always christ 349-5-14
joinword clear 249-45-14-1249
word clear 249-45-14-1249
nocross always clear 349-45-14
joinword comes 249-45-36-1249
word comes 249-45-36-1249
endword comes 36-1356
joinword coming 249-4-36-1249
word coming 249-4-36-1249
joinword common 249-5-36-1249
word common 249-5-36-1249
nocross always common 349-5-36
joinword concern 249-4-25-1249
word concern 249-4-25-1249
nocross always concern 349-4-25
joinword condition 249-5-25-1249
word condition 249-5-25-1249
nocross always condition 349-5-25
joinword consider 249-45-25-1249
word consider 249-45-25-1249
nocross always consider 349-45-25
nocross begmidword considera 349-45-25
joinword continue 249-456-25-1249
word continue 249-456-25-1249
nocross always continue 349-456-25
joinword course 249-4-14-1249
word course 249-4-14-1249
nocross always course 349-4-14

# D
joinword day 249-5-145-1249
word day 249-5-145-1249
nocross always day 349-5-145
joinword dear 249-45-256-1249
word dear 249-45-256-1249
nocross always dear 349-45-256
joinword did 249-456-145-1249
word did 249-456-145-1249
nocross always did 349-456-145
joinword differ 249-4-256-1249
word differ 249-4-256-1249
nocross always differ 349-4-256
joinword does 249-45-145-1249
word does 249-45-145-1249
endword does 45-145
begmidword does 145-135-1356
joinword doing 249-4-145-1249
word doing 249-4-145-1249
nocross endword doing 349-4-145
begmidword doing 145-135-346
joinword done 249-456-145-1249
word done 249-456-145-1249
nocross endword done 456-145
begmidword done 145-5-135
joinword down 249-456-256-1249
word down 249-456-256-1249
nocross begword down 349-456-256
midendword down 145-246-1345
joinword during 249-5-256-1249
word during 249-5-256-1249

# E
joinword each 249-45-15-1249
word each 249-45-15-1249
joinword enclose 249-456-26-1249
word enclose 249-456-26-1249
nocross always enclose 349-456-26
joinword endeavor 249-45-26-1249
word endeavor 249-45-26-1249
nocross always endeavor 349-45-26
joinword enter 249-4-26-1249
word enter 249-4-26-1249
nocross always enter 349-4-26
joinword entire 249-5-26-1249
word entire 249-5-26-1249
nocross begword entire 349-5-26
midword entir 26-2345-24-1235
joinword etc. 249-4-15-1249
word etc 249-4-15
word etc., 249-4-15-2
joinword even 249-456-15-1249
word even 249-456-15-1249
nocross begword even 349-456-15
midendword even 15-1236-26
joinword ever 249-5-15-1249
word ever 249-5-15-1249
nocross always ever 349-5-15
nocross begmidword evera 349-5-15
nocross begmidword evere 349-5-15
nocross begmidword evere 349-5-15
nocross begmidword everi 349-5-15
nocross begmidword evero 349-5-15
nocross begmidword everu 349-5-15
joinword example 249-456-1346-1249
word example 249-456-1346-1249
nocross begword example 349-456-1346
joinword except 249-4-1346-1249
word except 249-4-1346-1249
always except 349-4-1346
always unexceptional 346-4-1346-6-1345-123
joinword extra 249-5-1346-1249
word extra 249-5-1346-1249
nocross begword extra 349-5-1346
joinword extreme 249-45-1346-1249
word extreme 249-45-1346-1249
nocross begword extreme 349-45-1346

# F
joinword father 249-5-124-1249
word father 249-5-124-1249
nocross always father 349-5-124
joinword fear 249-45-124-1249
word fear 249-45-124-1249
always fear 349-45-124
joinword first 249-4-124-1249
word first 249-4-124-1249
begword first 249-4-124
midendword first 124-34
joinword follow 249-456-124-1249
word follow 249-456-124-1249
always follow 349-456-124
joinword foreign 249-5-123456-1249
word foreign 249-5-123456-1249
nocross always foreign 349-5-123456
joinword forget 249-4-123456-1249
word forget 249-4-123456-1249
nocross always forget 349-4-123456
always forgetting 123456-1245-356-346
joinword fortunate 249-456-123456-1249
word fortunate 249-456-123456-1249
nocross always fortunate 349-456-123456
joinword fortune 249-45-123456-1249
word fortune 249-45-123456-1249
nocross always fortune 349-45-123456

# G
joinword gave 249-456-2356-1249
word gave 249-456-2356-1249
nocross endword gave 349-456-2356
joinword give 249-5-2356-1249
word give 249-5-2356-1249
nocross begword give 349-5-2356
endword give 1245-1236
joinword given 249-456-2356-1249
word given 249-456-2356-1249
nocross endword given 349-456-2356
joinword giving 249-4-2356-1249
word giving 249-4-2356-1249
nocross endword giving 349-4-2356
begmidword giving 1245-1236-346
joinword god 249-5-1245-1249
word god 249-5-1245-1249
nocross always god 349-5-1245
joinword goes 249-45-1245-1249
word goes 249-45-1245-1249
nocross endword goes 45-1245
begmidword goes 1245-135-1356
joinword going 249-4-1245-1249
word going 249-4-1245-1249
nocross endword going 349-4-1245
begmidword going 1245-135-346
joinword gone 249-456-1245-1249
word gone 249-456-1245-1249
nocross endword gone 456-1245
begmidword gone 1245-5-135
joinword great 249-45-2356-1249
word great 249-45-2356-1249
begword great 349-45-2356
endword great 1245-1235-2345
